Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.180

Enforcement.

All county and state law enforcement officers and all employees and agents of the department shall enforce this chapter.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.24.180. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 16; RRS s 2874-16.]